Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB819.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 154.12-100 is amended to read as follows:
(1) "Economic development fund" means the fund authorized by the General Assembly
for the purpose of promoting economic development within the state.
(2) The economic development fund shall be funded through the issuance of bonds by
the State Property and Buildings Commission or other appropriation by the General
Assembly.
(3) The economic development fund shall be administered by the secretary of the
Cabinet for Economic Development. The authority shall promulgate administrative
regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A for project selection criteria and
administration of the economic development fund. The project selection criteria
shall include but not be limited to the following:
(a) Potential job creation or job retention;
(b) Degree of public or private and local involvement;
(c) Degree and conditions of project payback; and
(d) Amount of investment.
(4) Prior to submission of an economic development fund project to the authority, the
secretary of the Cabinet for Economic Development shall receive a written
commitment from the public or private organization which has requested funds
outlining projected job creation and retention, an investment breakdown, and
overall project description. This shall be submitted by the secretary to the authority.
Subsequently, the secretary of the Cabinet for Economic Development shall execute
a written agreement with the public or private organizations involved expressing in
detail the respective obligations on the parties.
(5) Projects of state agencies as defined in KRS 42.005 shall not be eligible for funding
from the economic development fund program, unless expressly provided in a
Page 1 of 2
XXXX 3/2/2026 2:59 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2436
branch budget bill. Airport construction and renovation projects shall be eligible for
funding under this section. The secretary of the Cabinet for Economic Development
shall consult with the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet on the
terms and conditions relating to the use of funds pursuant to this section before any
commitment is made on any project to any public or private organization.
(6) Following the approval by the authority, the project shall be presented by the
secretary of the Cabinet for Economic Development or his or her designee with
supporting documentation for review and approval at the next regularly scheduled
meeting of:
(a) The Capital Projects and Bond Oversight Committee pursuant to KRS 45.810;
and
(b) [at the next regularly scheduled meeting of ]The State Property and Buildings
Commission pursuant to KRS 56.450.
(7) Notwithstanding the provisions of KRS 56.872(3), the amount of economic
development funds issued during any biennium shall not exceed the balance of the
fund, and any funds authorized in the biennial budget shall carry forward and shall
not lapse.
(8) By November 1 of each year, the Cabinet for Economic Development shall prepare
and post an annual report to the cabinet's Web site as required in KRS 154.12-2035,
showing the economic development funds issued during the previous fiscal year,
funds disbursed, the amounts paid back, and the balance still owing with respect to
grants or loans made by the Cabinet for Economic Development with proceeds of
economic development funds during the previous five (5) fiscal years.
Page 2 of 2
XXXX 3/2/2026 2:59 PM Jacketed